Utah statutes.
16-10a-1603.   Scope of inspection right.
(1)  A shareholder's or director's agent or attorney has the same inspection
and copying rights as the shareholder or director represented by the agent or
attorney.
(2)  The right to copy records under Section 16-10a-1602 includes, if
reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, or
other means.
(3)  Except as provided in Section 16-10a-1606, the corporation may impose a
reasonable charge, payable in advance, covering the costs of labor and
material, for copies of any documents to be provided to the shareholder or
director.  The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or
reproduction of the records.
(4)  The corporation may comply with a shareholder's or director's demand to
inspect the record of shareholders under Subsection 16-10a-1602(2)(c) by
providing him with a list of the corporation's shareholders that complies with
Subsection 16-10a-1601(3) and was compiled no earlier than the date of the
shareholder's or director's demand.
